Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1408
Audits authorized.

An agreement may require the director to perform audits of persons required to be licensed who are based in this state to determine if the motor fuel taxes to be collected under the agreement have been properly reported and paid to each state participating in the agreement. The agreement may authorize other states to perform audits of persons required to be licensed who are based in such other state on behalf of the State of Nebraska and forward the findings to the director. The director may issue a notice of deficiency determination based on the findings from the other state.

The agreement shall not preclude the director from auditing the records of any person who has used motor fuels in this state. Any person required to be licensed shall make his or her records available on request of the director.

If the person is based in this state, the records shall be made available at the location designated by the director or such person may request the director to audit such records at the person's place of business. If the place of business is located outside this state, the director may require the person to reimburse the director for authorized per diem and travel expenses.

Laws 1988, LB 836, § 8;

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 28.